 User login Username: * Password: * Create new account Request new password News Go Observing Activities Astronomy Teacher Zone Student Zone Liverpool Telescope Live Webcam Status: Open Weather on La Palma Humidity: (Dry) Temperature: C Wind Speed: m/s So far tonight: Good NSO Observations Observed so far tonight: 24 Requests last 30 days: 1908 Running Total: 68754 Sponsored by LJMU About Us Liverpool Telescope Getting Started The Liverpool Telescope (LT) More about the NSO Register your School How to Observe with the LT Viewing images from the LT An online resource that brings the Universe into the classroom Free educational access to a professional robotic telescope Sir Patrick Moore - "a most exceptional resource" Sun Moon Planets ? Select Location ..... Aberdeen Belfast Birmingham Cambridge Cardiff Carlisle Edinburgh Glasgow London Liverpool Manchester Newcastle Norwich Penzance Portsmouth Shetland New NSO Resources 4 New Ask Andy's Competition Winners NSO: Watch this Space New Version of LT Image Andy's Astro Tour 
 Incomprehensible. Far as man made eyes can reach Peace If only for one Speck of Time tonight HOPE J. Foley A. Horkheimer or Download Current Video Episodes What Is Star Gazers? Keep Looking Up! Jack Horkheimer CLICK HERE for List Star Gazer Information Star Gazer Bio Past Show Scripts Star Gazer QA First Script Star Gazer FAQ Star Gazer Videos Star Gazer Crew Star Gazer Cartoons Star Gazers' Favorite Web Links *************************************************************************** ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------ FOR FAMILY AND FRIENDS Horkheimer's Heavens - Helios Doomsday 1982 Planets Of The 50's Click Here! We would love to hear your comments. The George E. Batchelor Foundation The William J. and Tina Rosenberg Foundation Jack and Ruth Admire Funding for Web Site provided by Dr. and Mrs. Albert Ehlert WPBT 
 2012 by Stanford SOLAR Center Permitted Uses Credits 
 Make a scale model of the Solar System and learn the REAL definition of "space." This Page requires a JavaScript capable browser. Fill in the diameter of the Sun you want your model to be scaled by. You can fill in either the red bordered inches box or the green bordered millimeters box. Important: Only fill in one box. If both are filled in you will get a dialog box asking you to clear one of the boxes. Use the Clear You can click on the names of the planets and satellites to go the the Nine Planets Solar System Model Body Body Diam (km) Body Diam (in) Body Diam (mm) Orbit radius (km) Scaled orbit radius (ft in) Scaled orbit radius (meters) Sun 1391900 Mercury 4866 57950000 ft in m Venus 12106 108110000 ft in m Earth 12742 149570000 ft in m Mars 6760 227840000 ft in m Jupiter 142984 778140000 ft in m Saturn 116438 1427000000 ft in m Uranus 46940 2870300000 ft in m Neptune 45432 4499900000 ft in m Pluto 2274 5913000000 ft in m Other interesting distances and speeds Quantity Real Quantity Scaled Quantity (English) Scaled Quantity (Metric) Speed of light 299792 km/sec in/sec mm/sec Light year 9.46051E+12 km mi km Distances to Stars and Galaxies To Alpha Centauri 4.03964E+13 km mi km To Sirius 8.17388E+13 km mi km To Deneb 1.32636E+16 km mi km To Galactic center 2.62151E+17 km mi km Sizes of Stars Hottest star (Type 05) 12527100 km ft m Coolest star (Type M5) 222704 km in cm Red giant (Betelgeuse) 521962500 km ft m White dwarf (Sirius B) 13919 km in mm Neutron star 20 km in mm click here OpenOffice Download OpenOffice-format spreadsheet (25 kbytes) Download Excel-format spreadsheet (45 kbytes) Links to other Solar System resources Your Age On Other Worlds Your Weight On Other Worlds The Exploratorium's "Observatory" The Nine Planets A Solar System Scale Model Meta Page. Another downloadable spreadsheet from Planeten Paultje in the Netherlands. A new geocaching model in California. Get out that GPS to find the planets! New Jersey Astronomical Association Solar System Walk And Yet Another Model In Maine! Solar System Exploration from NASA-JPL NSSDC Photo Gallery JPL's Welcome to the Planets Astronomy Picture of the Day Proportional Planets for his fantastic Nine Planets web site. Ron Hipschman , Exploratorium 
 | Ask the Experts | Interactive Timeline | Hubble | Trivia Challenge | Classroom Activities | | Program Information | Screen Saver | Links | Buy the Video in association with Devillier Donegan Enterprises. 
 . Made by students for the ThinkQuest 
 SEGway Home Science Education Gateway (SEGway) is part of the Center for Science Education (CSE) at Space Sciences Laboratory (SSL), University of California, Berkeley . Copyright 2005-2008 Regents of the University of California. 
 About News Why Celestial Navigation Reader Page Dante Webmistress History History The Vikings Wayfinding Theory Theory Navigational Astronomy Practice Practice Navigational Instruments Resources Resources CelNav in the Classroom Schools Quotations Links of Interest Contact This webpage is an attempt to bring together all of the best Celestial Navigation resources on the internet, with pointers to other resources as well. Find out why we should study Celestial navigation in the age of GPS; get an introduction to Celestial Navigations history , then take a look at the navigational astronomy page as a background for the theory and practice ; teachers, discover how celestial navigation can enliven the classroom , whether your field is earth science, astronomy, math, history, or literature, with special links about Vikings ; learn about navigational instruments , including sextants, astrolabes, nocturnals, and planispheres; learn about nonwestern, noninstrument Polynesian starpaths and Wayfinding ; read quotations about navigation; check out some schools ; or just go directly to the list of resources which lists the sources from the other pages. Other links of interest are here . EXCELLENT NEWS! The Starpath company, under the eminent David Burch, has completed making ALL the back issues of the Navigation Foundation newsletters into free downloads for readers! I used to subscribe, and believe me, the issues are jam-packed with wonderful articles. This is a great gift to the celestial navigation community! See the volume links here: http://www.starpath.com/foundation/newsletter.htm . You may also purchase them on CD. NEW ROBERT REDFORD MOVIE, ALL IS LOST , GETTING RAVES AT CANNES. A MAN LOST AT SEA WITH ONLY A SEXTANT! Search Latest News 2012 Message From the Webmistress A Message from the Webmistress A Poem in Defense of Lunars Navigation Foundation 2008 Message All original material copyright 2009-2014. Every effort has been made to use only pictures in the public domain or created by webmistress. ( why "webmistress?" ) If you are the copyright owner of a picture or quotation inadvertently used without attribution or permission, contact me . Please write with links and corrections as well. Website design by VN Productions . 
 LEARN ABOUT INFRARED IMAGES NASA/GOES Last Updated: Author: Linda Hermans-Killam outreach@ipac.caltech.edu 
 Heavenly Mathematics Cultural Astronomy (GEK1506) Adam Schall (汤若望 [湯若望], Tāng Rùowàng, 1591-1666), Imperial Astronomer in Beijing. Designed the current Chinese calendar Astronomers at the Istanbul Observatory Welcome to Heavenly Mathematics Cultural Astronomy! Objectives of the Module Topics to be Covered Practical Information and Assessment Course Schedule IVLE Course Page with Discussion Forum Recommended Texts Astronomical Java Applets and Animations Astronomical Video Clips Strobel's Astronomy Notes Stellarium Software Course Content Astronomy and its History Calendars Observing the Sun and the Moon from Different Parts of the World The Equation of Time Ancient Astronomical Instruments Astrology Navigation Cartography Archaeoastronomy Cultural Astronomy Astronomy in Nature Bad Astronomy and Pseudoscience Additional Information Lecture Notes Homework and Tutorials Old Exams Summary Past Homework Past Projects References Good-bye! Helmer Aslaksen's home page Objectives of the Module The goal of this course is to study astronomy and mathematics in a cultural context. We will look at questions like: How is the date of Chinese New Year determined? Why do the Muslim and Chinese months start on different days? Will the Moon ever look like it does on the Singapore flag? What date of the year is the earliest sunrise in Singapore? How did ancient sailors navigate? After taking this course you will become conscious of the motion of the Sun and the Moon and notice and question things you have earlier taken for granted. You will appreciate mankind's struggle through the ages and throughout the world to understand the mathematics of the heavens. This course is one of the General Education Modules at the NUS. Back to top of page Astronomical instruments in the Imperial Observatory in Beijing made by the Jesuit missionary Ferdinand Verbiest, 1670 Topics to be Covered We start by discussing the motion of the Sun and the Moon. Most astronomy books are written from a high northern latitude point of view, but in this course we will take a hemispherically correct, tropical point of view. We then look at applications with a cultural flavor. In Singapore we use the Gregorian, Chinese, Islamic and Indian calendars for determining the public holidays and you will learn the rules for these calendars. Most people expect the time of sunrise and sunset in Singapore to stay fixed throughout the year, but we will study the equation of time and the analemma to see why there is a half hour variation. Navigation has been important to people all over the world throughout history, and people at different latitudes developed fundamentally different methods. If we have time, we will look at ancient astronomical instruments , astrology , cartography , archaeoastronomy (the use of astronomy in archaeology), cultural astronomy and astronomy in nature . Back to top of page Brian Greig's astronomical instruments for sale at the Melbourne Arts Centre Sunday Market Practical Information and Assessment Classes There will be three hours of lectures and one hour of large group tutorial each week. The time slots in 2010/2011 Semester 1 are Monday and Thursday 8-10 a.m. in LT34. I take a 10 minutes break in the middle, and aim to finish by 15 to the hour. I realize that 8 am is not a good time, but that is what we were given. The module is very lecture intensive, so please do not take the module if you do not plan to attend lectures at 8 am. I'm only supposed to give three hours of lectures so on Thursday I will use the last hour (9 to 10) as a tutorial starting in Week 3. Alternatively, there will be a small group tutorial, too. (Wednesday 5-6 in LT34, starting in Week 3.) The first two weeks I use all four hours for lectures because there is so much practical stuff to cover. The last week there will be small tutorial and I will use all four hours for lectures and review. Feel free to attend whichever tutorial fits your schedule. The small one tends to be highly interactive. The timetable on IVLE lists the main tutorial as Thursday 10-11. This is WRONG! It will be Thursday 9-10, but is probably because it can't be listed at time because the lecture is listed at that time. I use a cordless microphone and walk around in class and ask questions. But don't worry, I only ask easy questions! I also like to create physical demonstrations to illustrate the concepts, and I often need for this. I am not afraid of looking silly, and I hope you are not either! The lectures will be NUScast. The goal of the webcast if to give you a chance to take another look at things you didn't catch, or to help you if arrive a couple of minutes late. They are not meant as a substitute for going to lectures. I'm afraid my lecturing style is not very suitable for webcast. I move around a lot, and I rely on physical demonstrations that probably will not show up in the webcast. Webcast is great for lecturers who read aloud from their lecture notes, which is not my style. Please do not take the module if you plan to rely on the webcast. Assessment The final exam counts 50% of your grade. There will be a midterm that counts 30%. There will also be a homework that counts 20% and is done in groups of four to six students. There will be a midterm test on Monday 27/9/2010 at 8 am in MPSH1 Section B. The homework is due at the beginning of class on Monday 25/10/2010. The exam will be on Monday 22/11/2010, 9-11 am. I want both hard copy and soft copy. Don't worry if the printed copy doesn't look nice, if for instance you don't have a color printer or if you have to do a printout of a web page you created. Please submit the soft copy of the homework to the IVLE workbin. However, I don't want to get 50 files called Homework.doc. Please use the number of your group as the first two characters in the file name. For example 04 Homework.doc. I have a special system for group assessment. Each group can either choose to have everybody get the same grade (the default), or you can choose to grade the others in your group, by saying how many percent of the final mark the others deserve. If you manage to agree, I will follow what you agree on! Just gather everybody and come and see me. If you cannot agree, come and see me (separately, if necessary), and I will take the average. But I will not let that average count 100%. I will give it a weight of x%, and the uniform distribution will get weight (100-x)%. I will not tell you what x is, and I may even use different x for different groups. I encourage you to discuss this in a polite, friendly, reasonable, generous and compassionate way, and make every effort to reach a unanimous decision. My weightage may not be fair, so try to sort it out yourselves. At the same time, I want to have a way to protect people from unreasonable group mates. To sum up: If you are OK with everybody getting the same mark, then do nothing. If you can all agree on a non-uniform marking scheme, then come and see me. If you cannot agree, then come and see me with your individual schemes and I will average and adjust. Groups Please do the homework in a group of four to six people. Don't worry if you have a hard time finding a group, you're probably not alone! Post a message on the discussion forum and you'll probably find other people in the same situation who you can form a group with. Homework I used to have two homework, but many students complained that it was too much work and too dependent on good weather, so I have simplified into one homework . Take three pictures showing the change in the setting (or rising) position of the Sun in the course of the semester Take three pictures showing the changes in the shadow cast by a ring Take pictures of the Western horizon on the first three days of the lunar month to determine the day of the first visibility of the lunar crescent, i.e., the first day of the Muslim month Take a picture of the first daytime visibility of the Moon Determine the tilt of the Moon when it is a crescent close to the horizon Estimate where and when the Sun can be seen from your window in the course of the year E-mail I get a lot of e-mail, so it would be helpful if you try to observe the following. If you are confused about something, chances are that a lot of other people in class are confused about the same. So why not post a question on the IVLE Forum? Then the answer will benefit everybody! And I won't have to answer the same question over and over again in individual e-mails! I know that some of you may not feel comfortable about asking a question, but trust me, most of your class mates will not think it is stupid. They will probably be very grateful to you! It's a great way to show some leadership! If the question involves geometrical arguments (as most of the material in this class does), it might be easier for both you and me if you ask me after class or come by my office some time. When people ask me about X, the problem is very often not that they don't understand X, but that there is something more basic they don't understand. When you ask me a question, try to state what you understand and what you understand. In that way we can get to the essence of your confusion more quickly. I don't mind your answer if you are genuinely unsure, but if you send me a long list of questions to check, including many that I'm convinced you know very well, I get the feeling that you're not really valuing my time. If you send me e-mail, please use the module code GEK1506 in the subject. Otherwise you may end up in my spam folder. This is especially important if you use a non-NUS e-mail address. Try to avoid sending me huge files. When you're submitting homework, you can use the workbin, burn a CD or bring a thumb drive along. If you have your own web page you can just send me a link. Many of the questions involve geometry, and it is hard to discuss it by e-mail. If you want to make an appointment to see me, just mail me and tell me when you are free. Back to top of page Course Schedule Week 1 First week of lectures, no lecture on Mon 9/8/2010 Week 2 Signing up for groups, no lecture Mon 16/8/2010 Week 3 Tutorial 1 Week 4 Tutorial 2 Week 5 Tutorial 3 Week 6 Tutorial 4 Mid-semester Break Yippee!!! :-) Week 7 Midterm test Monday 27/9/2010 at 8 am in MPSH1 Section B, Tutorial 5 Week 8 Tutorial 6 Week 9 Tutorial 7 Week 10 Tutorial 8 Week 11 Homework due Monday 25/10/2010, Tutorial 9 Week 12 Tutorial 10 Week 13 Last lecture Thursday 11/11/2010 8-10, no tutorial Reading Week Don't panic! Stay cool! Exam Exam Monday 22/11/2010 9 am. Good luck! Back to top of page Royal Observatory Greenwich IVLE Course Page I have a course page at IVLE, the Integrated Virtual Learning Environment . It contains several useful tools. A discussion forum that I encourage you to use A workbin where you submit soft copies of homework A class list with e-mail addresses The latest timetable information Otherwise, the current page is the main source of information. Back to top of page Recommended Texts Unfortunately, there's no textbook for this course. Maybe I'll try to write one myself? The closest is The Ever-Changing Sky, A Guide to the Celestial Sphere by James B. Kaler . However, it goes into a lot more detail about astronomy than we will cover. The level of astronomy I expect you to learn is comparable to the first chapter and the appendix of The Copernican Revolution, Planetary Astronomy in the Development of Western Thought by Thomas S. Kuhn. For convenience, the main reference for the first part will be Strobel's Astronomy Notes on the web. I have compiled a list of additional references . In addition to the books by Kaler and Kuhn, I've also placed The History and Practice of Ancient Astronomy by James Evans and Calendrical Calculations: The Millennium Edition by Nachum Dershowitz and Edward M. Reingold on RBR in the Science Library. Back to top of page Orrery by Brian Greig Astronomical Java Applets and Animations Together with Tey Meng Khoon and Frederick H. Willeboordse of CITA (Centre for Information Technology and Applications), I have developed interactive Java applets that I hope will help you understand the motion of the Earth, the Sun and the Moon. You will notice that a lot of the applets are somewhat similar. They show the same thing, but we're trying to emphasis different aspects or points of view in each one. You can get the Java Runtime Environment (JRE) at java.com . If you prefer to view the applets off-line, you can download them. Just unzip astro-applets.zip, and open astro-applets.html in your browser. The Motion of the Earth Around the Sun . This is a pretty basic applet showing the Earth moving around the Sun. But pay attention to how you can determine the equinoxes and solstices by looking at the position of the Earth's axis, and how the declination changes. The Apparent Motion of the Sun . This shows the spiral of circles. The Apparent Motion of the Sun at Different Latitudes . Now you can see how the spiral of circles changes depending on your latitude. The Apparent Motion of the Sun at Different Times of the Year . This is one of my favorite applets, that I use over and over again in my class. If you really understand this applet, you will get a good grade in my class! The Motion of the Sun Along the Ecliptic . Another of my favorites. If you really understand this applet, you have arrived! A Vertical Sundial . One of the points of this applets, is to make you understand why you shouldn't make a vertical sundial. (Unless you are a polar bear or a penguin!) The Astrological Houses at Different Latitudes . Astrologers like to talk about your ascendant and other . Unfortunately, the house system depends very much on your latitude. Very few astrologers understand how this works. If you want to understand this, get the book Making Sense of Astrology by Ronny Martens, Tim Trachet and study this applet. What does the waxing or waning Moon look like in different parts of the world in the course of the year? This is something that confuses a lot of people! A simplified model of the tilt of the waxing or waning Moon in different parts of the world ignores the tilt of the ecliptic, and assumes that the Sun and the Moon both move along the celestial equator. You may want to start out with this applet. If you studied the previous applet, you are now hopefully ready for the real thing. What does the waxing or waning Moon look like in different parts of the world in the course of the year? The last two applets are related to What Does the Waxing or Waning Moon Look Like in Different Parts of the World? Back to top of page Equatorial (left) and ecliptic (right) armillary spheres in the Imperial Observatory in Beijing made by the Jesuit missionary Ferdinand Verbiest, 1670 Video Clips Together with Keith Phua Kuan Wee of CITA (Centre for Information Technology and Applications), I have recorded video clips to help you understand the material. The clips are available in three formats: RealVideo SureStream, click the link to stream. The quality and file size of the clip is determined by the preference settings in your RealPlayer. RealVideo LAN/150Kbps, right-click to download. QuickTime , click to stream, right-click to download. I have recorded video clips to explain the Java applets and Strobel's Astronomy Notes . Back to top of page Strobel's Astronomy Notes Nick Strobel of Bakersfield College has written a wonderful set of Astronomy Notes for his introductory astronomy course. His chapter on Astronomy Without a Telescope is very relevant background for this module. I have recorded video clips with annotations to some of the sections of the first chapter of Strobel's notes. Here is the table of content for the first chapter of Strobel's Astronomy Notes with links to my video clips. Astronomy Without a Telescope . Celestial Sphere Defined : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Angles Reference Markers : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Motion of Our Star the Sun : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Coordinates : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Time and Seasons : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Time Zones and Equation of Time : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Seasons Sections Review Motions of the Moon : RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . Phases and Eclipses Eclipse Details: Lunar Eclipse Planetary Motions Back to top of page Stellarium Software I recommend the wonderful freeware Stellarium Astronomy Software (or from Sourceforge ) available for Windows, Linux/Unix and MacOSX. I have written a Help Page . Back to top of page Astronomy and its History How can we use the celestial sphere to understand the movement of the Sun, Moon and stars across the sky? Observing the sky has always been an important part of human civilization. We give a summary of some basic facts from spherical astronomy. One of my students, Viduranga Yashasui Waisundara, has written a beautiful poem about this, called If I were God . There are a lot of Myths about the Copernican Revolution . Many people whose main interest is philosophy of science, but with little knowledge of astronomy or history of science, have written extensively about it. Unfortunately, much of what they say is incorrect. Tycho Brahe (1546-1601) Multimedia Please check out my Astronomical Java Applets and Animations and Astronomical Video Clips . The Nebraska Astronomy Applet Project has a number of interesting modules. Remember to check all the boxes! Basic Coordinates and Seasons Lab with Seasons and Ecliptic Simulator . The Rotating Sky Lab with Rotating Sky Explorer , Bands in the Sky , Paths of the Stars and Two Systems: Celestial, Horizon . Motions of the Sun Lab with Paths of the Sun Simulator , Paths of the Sun , Meridional Altitude and Seasons and the Zodiac . Lunar Phases Labs with Lunar Phase Simulator . Solar System Models Lab with Elongation and Elongations and Configurations . Sun's Position on Horizon Sun's Rays Simulator Union Seasons Demonstrator Azimuth/Altitude Demonstrator RA/Dec Demonstrator Meridional Altitude Simulator Retrograde Motion Declination Angle of the Sun from pvcdrom.pveducation.org Demonstrations and Animations for Teaching Astronomy - D A T A at Department of Astronomy - University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. Models of Planetary Motion from Antiquity to the Renaissance . Course pages Nick Strobel of Bakersfield College has written a wonderful set of Astronomy Notes for his introductory astronomy course. His chapter on Astronomy Without a Telescope is very relevant background for this module. I have recorded video clips with annotations to some of the sections of the first chapter of Strobel's notes. From Stargazers to Starships by David P. Stern. The course Introduction to Astronomy by Scott R. Anderson has great animations. The course Math Culture, Late Renaissance Thought and the New Universe by Dorothy Wallace Scott Sciortino of Dartmouth College is very interesting. The Meridian Line at Greenwich Astronomical Institutions For general astronomy info, my favorite is the web site of the Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory . Their Data Services and Astronomical Information Center contain a lot of useful information. HM Nautical Almanac Observatory in the UK makes very nice lunar visibility charts. Their Websurf contains a wealth of information, including Global First Sighting of New Crescent Moon information for the last couple of years. The charts for the current month are also available at Moon Watch . The Royal Observatory Greenwich . Their information leaflets on Time and Timekeeping are very good. Museum of the History of Science, University of Oxford has many interesting exhibitions. Skywatching Night Sky This Week - NightSkyInfo.com Earth Sky: Skywatching Sky and Telescope - This Week's Sky at a Glance SPACE.com General Astronomy Sites Wolfgang R. Dick's History of astronomy page. Starry Messenger by David Chart of the Department of History and Philosophy of Science of the University of Cambridge. Physics and astronomy applets by Juergen Giesen. Phil Plait's Bad Astronomy: The Home Page . Basic Celestial Phenomena by Kerry Magruder. Astronomy Culture is part of Astronomy Homework Help by Gary Agranat . Singaporean Astronomy Related Sites The Astronomical Society of Singapore . The Singapore Science Centre has a nice Skytrack site. NUS Astronomical Society . singastro.org . Back to top of page Calendars How is the date for Chinese New Year, Eid ul-Fitr (Hari Raya Puasa) and Deepavali determined? Singapore is unique in that we use four different calendars for determining the date of the public holidays. Seven of our eleven public holidays move, and we study the rules for Chinese New Year, the two Eid's (Hari Raya's), Deepavali, Vesak Day and Good Friday. The exact rules are very complex, but the basic ideas are simple. We give two simple rules of thumb that determine the date for Chinese New Year with a margin of error of one day. I have written a set of lecture notes on The Mathematics of the Public Holidays of Singapore . You will also see why both Eid ul-Fitrs (Hari Raya Puasas) in 2000 were celebrated one day earlier than they would have been if MUIS had relied on sightings or scientific criteria. Why is it difficult to determine the Islamic prayer times in Northern Europe? This is an interesting astronomical problem, which very few people understand. What are leap seconds? This requires understanding some delicate points in the definition of atomic time. Chinese astronomers determining the summer solstice General Calendar Info I have a page on Calendars in Singapore . It contains a paper I have written about The Mathematics of the Chinese Calendar . I have also written a shorter introduction called When is Chinese New Year? . This paper won a fourth prize in the Fifth Annual Boeing Writing Contest , which is organized by the Griffith Observatory . The article appeared in the Griffith Observer v. 66 (2002), no. 2 (February), 1-17. I have also written a set of lecture notes on The Mathematics of the Public Holidays of Singapore . Honours project on Calendars in Singapore by my student Rachel Lee Tang Hwee. The most authoritative reference on calendars is the book Calendrical Calculations by Nachum Dershowitz and Edward M. Reingold of the Department of Computer Science at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. If you need a calendar conversion program, the place to go is their Calendar Applet . Before the book by Dershowitz and Reingold, the chapter about Calendars by L. E. Doggett in the Explanatory Supplement to the Astronomical Almanac was the standard reference. The Calendar FAQ by Claus Tøndering. Calendars Through the Ages is part of WebExhibits . The Worldwide Holiday Festival Site (http://www.holidayfestival.com/) was very comprehensive. (Broken link. Can anybody please help?) The Calendar Zone . CalendarHome.com . Time-reckoning in Iceland before literacy by Þorsteinn Vilhjálmsson. Chinese sundials from the Adler Planetarium The Chinese and other East Asian Calendars I have a page on The Chinese Calendar . It contains a paper I have written about The Mathematics of the Chinese Calendar . Undergraduate research project on The Chinese Calendar of the Later Han Period by my students Kuan Shau Hong and Teng Keat Huat. Undergraduate research project on Calendars, Interpolation, Gnomons and Armillary Spheres in the Work of Guo Shoujing (1231-1314) by my student Ng Say Tiong. Undergraduate research project on Strings of Long Months and Short Months in the Chinese Calendar by my student Zhang Jieping. Zhuo Meng's Make Your Own Chinese Calendar is a wonderful tool! The Western-Chinese Calendar Converter at www.mandarintools.com . Harold C. Hill, Department of East Asian Languages and Literatures, Washington and Lee University, has a very interesting page on http://www.wlu.edu/~hhill/calendar.html about The cyclical calendar. (Broken link. Can anybody please help?) The Lunar Calendar in Japan by Steve Renshaw and Saori Ihara is the best source for information about the Japanese calendar. Vietnamese lunar calendar conversion by Ho Ngoc Duc of Institute of Informatics, University of Leipzig. MoonCalc image The Islamic Calendar I have a page on The Islamic Calendar , which contains additional links. You will see why both Eid ul-Fitrs (Hari Raya Puasas) in 2000 were celebrated one day earlier than they would have been if MUIS had relied on sightings or scientific criteria. Undergraduate research project on Lunar Visibility and the Islamic Calendar by my student Leong Wen Xin. Notes for lecture on How Does the Islamic Calendar Really Work in Different Parts of the World? at the AMS/MAA meeting in Atlanta 2005. Moonsighting.com by Khalid Shaukat. Dr. Monzur Ahmed is the author of MoonCalc , which for many years was the leading lunar visibility and Islamic calendar software. He has pages on Astronomy and Islam and Ramadhan (Ramadan) and Eid-al-Fitr . The web page of the Islamic Crescents' Observation Project (ICOP) has a number of interesting articles. They also host the software Accurate Times by Mohammad Odeh. It is a Windows program for the Islamic calendar, Qiblah direction, and prayer times. There are samples of the lunar visibility charts on Visibility of Ramadan Crescent . Their page on The Actual Saudi Dating System will probably surprise many. Islamic calendar for Singapore by Majlis Ugama Islam Singapura (MUIS) , the Islamic Religious Council of Singapore. MUIS seems to move the location of their calendar around from year to year. If the link doesn't work, go to their homepage and look under or do a search for Takwim (or Taqwim). This will give you MUIS's prediction for first visibility of the lunar crescent. But it is based on a dubious method, so you will often not be able to see the Moon on the day when MUIS claims that you will. Please see my page on The Islamic Calendar . HM Nautical Almanac Observatory in the UK makes very nice lunar visibility charts. Their Websurf contains a wealth of information, including Global First Sighting of New Crescent Moon information for the last couple of years. The charts for the current month are also available at Moon Watch . Moon Watch . Crescent Moon Visibility and the Islamic Calendar from the Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory . Moon Research Centre (U.K) . The article on Policies Adopted in Britain by Muslims in Celebrating Islamic Festivals is essential reading! They also have a copy of the RGO Astronomical Information Sheet No. 6 . Crescent-Sighting and Islamic Calendars and Islamic Astronomy: Questions, Comments and Correspondence by David McNaughton. Crescent Section from the Jordanian Astronomical Society . Their section on The Actual Saudi Dating System is essential reading! Islamic Crescents' Observation Project . Predicting the First Visibility of the Lunar Crescent , The Umm al-Qura Calendar of Saudi Arabia , Islamic-Western Calendar Converter (Based on the Arithmetical or Tabular Calendar) and Internet sites over de islamitische tijdrekening (in Dutch) by Robert H. van Gent . CrescentWatch Australia is a nice site, but they have a bad moon rising on the top. Can you tell what's wrong with the pictures? Qibla - the direction to Mecca Determining the direction to Mecca was together with determining the first visibility of the lunar crescent and computing prayer times one of the central problems in Islamic astronomy. It requires a clear understanding of spherical trigonometry and knowing how to find longitude. However, you would think that at the moment it would be a trivial computation. I was therefore quite surprised when I started to receive e-mails from Muslims in the US and Canada asking me about it. I then realized that it is a major controversy among Muslims in North America. All the famous Muslim astronomers and mathematicians in the past, like al-Khwarizmi (780-850), al-Battani (858-929) and al-Tusi (1201-1274) agreed that qibla should be measured by great circle. However, some people who are used to looking at Mercator maps and don't understand that lines of sight are represented by great circles argue that you should draw straight lines on a Mercator map, i.e., follow rhumb lines. They strongly attack people who follow the traditional method of great circles. For examples of this, see Direction of Al-Qiblah , Determining the direction of the Qibla and Qiblah.us . For a scientifically correct discussion, please see moonsighting.com , the excellent paper The Correct Qibla by Kamal Abdali or Which Way Is Jerusalem? Which Way Is Mecca? The Direction-Facing Problem in Religion and Geography by Daniel Z. Levina. Prayer Times Islamic Agenda-Prayer Times Celestial Calendar - Islam - Prayer Times The Determination of Salat Times by Monzur Ahmed Explanation of Islamic Prayer Timing Prayer Times Calculation and PrayTime Manual by Hamid Zarrabi-Zadeh The Islamic Prayer Times – Computational Philosophy with Particular Reference to the Lack of Twilight Cessation at Higher Latitudes The Q++ Salat Calculator (Muslim Prayer Times) from The Q++ Studio Diary and Calendar Publishing System The Indian Calendar I have a page on The Indian Calendar . I have a page on When is Deepavali (Diwali)? . Honours project on Indian Calendars by my student LEOW Choon Lian. Undergraduate research project by my student Daphne CHIA on Indian Calendars: Comparing the Surya Siddhanta and the Astronomical Ephemeris , 2001. Undergraduate research project by my student Akshay REGULAGEDDA on Panchanga-Tantra: The Magic of the Indian Calendar System , 2002. Undergraduate research project by my students Akhil DOEGAR and Akshay PRASAD on Indian Calendars , 2002. Easter The Date of Easter from the Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory . Time Leap Seconds , from the Time Service Department, U.S. Naval Observatory . Back to top of page Observing the Sun and the Moon from Different Parts of the World This is one of my favorite topics. I have some lecture notes about this, which I'm trying to expand on. Most astronomy books are written from a point of view. I will discuss the motion of the Sun and the Moon from a point of view, with special emphasis on the needs of observers. I have a number of web pages about astronomical topics from a Singaporean point of view. What is with the Singapore flag? Why is the coat of arms more correct? Find out on my page on The Mathematics and Astronomy of the Singapore Flag . What Does the Waxing or Waning Moon Look Like in Different Parts of the World? This is a complex question that confuses many people. If you look at a map with time zones, you will see that Singapore and West Malaysia are in the time zone! For more details, please see my page Why is Singapore in the time zone? Which Day Does the Sun Rise Earliest in Singapore? We are at one degree north, so most people think the Sun will rise the same time every day. Not! Where is the Geographical Origin of Coordinates of Singapore? Calendars in Singapore . We are not just a multiracial, multicultural society; we are a multicalendrical society! Some of my students have contributed greatly to this. One of my favorites is the following e-mail from one of my students, LIEW Wen Hwee. Subject: The theory of hanging clothes to dry Hi Sir, Ohh my. I just discovered the theory behind my mum's theory of hanging clothes to dry. My mum have been telling me since I was a kid that for half of the year that she will have to hang the clothes out in the kitchen and the other half of the year in the corridor for them to dry. I was perplexed by her for a long time. I thought wasn't the sun suppose to rise East always? And your lesson cleared my doubts!!! My flat lies exactly (ermmm maybe not that exact. didn't notice tat until I used the compass. Was almost scared by a faulty compass that points in the direction where the sun rises!!!) in the East- west plane. And so for half of the year, the sun be in the South-east and the other half in the North-east. MY MUM IS AN ASTRONOMER !!!(ha.). Sir, what u have taught is of practical purpose!!! (Maybe u could tell the next batch of students abt tat and they could advise their mum on how to better dry their clothes. =)) Thanks a lot, Sir!!! Sun and Moon info The National Environment Agency on Singapore has a number of interesting pages, like Sunrise and Sunset Times, Moonrise and Moonset Times and Tide Times for Singapore . The Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory has a lot of interesting pages on their Data Services and Astronomical Information Center , like Phases of the Moon and Percent of the Moon Illuminated , Rise, Set, and Twilight Definitions , Earth's Seasons - Equinoxes, Solstices, Perihelion, and Aphelion, 2000-2020 , Complete Sun and Moon Data for One Day: Locations Worldwide and Sun or Moon Rise/Set Table for One Year: Locations Worldwide . You can use the last one to print out a table of rising and setting times for the Sun and the Moon in Singapore. The coordinates of Singapore are 104 east and 1 north. Our time zone is UTC + 8. If you need to do computations, there is a handy table of the equation of time and the Sun's declination on the Daily Sun Data at Tony Helyar's Home Page . A nice Table of the Declination of the Sun . Sun, Moon Earth Applet and Sun Declination Equation of Time from Juergen Giesen's GeoAstro Java Applet Collection . Moon Phases . Islamic calendar for Singapore by Majlis Ugama Islam Singapura (MUIS) , the Islamic Religious Council of Singapore. MUIS seems to move the location of their calendar around from year to year. If the link doesn't work, go to their homepage and look under or do a search for Takwim (or Taqwim). This will give you MUIS's prediction for first visibility of the lunar crescent. But it is based on a dubious method, so you will often not be able to see the Moon on the day when MUIS claims that you will. Please see my page on The Islamic Calendar . Singapore weather and tide info National Environment Agency on Singapore has a number of interesting pages, like WeatherWise Singapore , Climatology of Singapore , FAQs-Meteorological Service and Sunrise and Sunset Times, Moonrise and Moonset Times and Tide Times for Singapore . World Weather Information Service - Singapore from the World Meteorological Organization. Back to top of page The Equation of Time I have a separate web page on Which Day Does the Sun Rise Earliest in Singapore? Singapore lies almost on the equator, so most people would expect the Sun to rise at more or less the same time each day of the year. In fact, the sunrise time varies between 6:46 a.m. and 7:17 a.m., with the earliest sunrise on November 1 and the latest on February 9. In the same way, the sunset time varies between 6:50 p.m. and 7:21 p.m., with the earliest sunset on November 5 and the latest on February 13. The difference between the earliest and latest sunrise in 30 minutes, but the difference between the longest and shortest day is only 8 minutes. The key to understanding this is the analemma , which is a graphical representation of the equation of time. Analemma picture by Dennis di Cicco The famous picture by Sky Telescope's Dennis di Cicco records the Sun's position in the sky at the same time of day on 45 different dates throughout the year. This is also related to the concept of time zones. As you can see from the map , Singapore and West Malaysia are in the time zone! For more details, please see my page Why is Singapore in the time zone? Sundial in Enschede, Netherlands, 1836, photo by Fer J. de Vries. The Equation of Time I have recorded a video clip that explains this picture: RealVideo SureStream , RealVideo LAN/150Kbps , QuickTime . I have a page on Which Day Does the Sun Rise Earliest in Singapore? Most books on astronomy are written from a point of view; instead I take a tropical point of view. You will learn how to prepare a table of sunrise and sunset times for your location. I strongly recommend the analemma.com site. Equinoxes , The Dark Days of Winter and Comparative Lengths of Days and Nights from the Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory . In the past you could order a copy of Dennis di Cicco's famous analemma picture from Sky Telescope. Sky Telescope used to have a great comic strip called SkyWise. One month SkyWise discussed Latest Sunrise, Earliest Sunset. Sky Telescope no longer has a free archive, but you can look it up in a library. NIGHT and DAY by Walter R. Steiger and George W. Bunton. The solar analemma - Luxorion . The Analemma Project . Astrophotography by Anthony Ayiomamitis . Stanford SOLAR Center -- Ask A Solar Physicist FAQs - Answer . For great graphics, see the site by Andrew Marsh at The School of Architecture and Fine Arts at The University of Western Australia (http://fridge.arch.uwa.edu.au/topics/thermal/sun/sunpos.html). (Broken link. Can anybody please help?) A nice Table of the Declination of the Sun . If you need to do computations, there is a handy table of the equation of time and the Sun's declination on the Daily Sun Data at Tony Helyar's Home Page . The Analemma by Jon Kahl of University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee. Analemma, my Analemma by Douglas Dodds. (You need to scroll down a bit.) Sundials on the Internet - the Equation of Time . Back to top of page Ancient Astronomical Instruments Why do sundials look different in Singapore and Beijing? We study the theory behind sundials and show how to construct an accurate sundial for any latitude. There are several nice sundials in Singapore. Sundial in Jurong Bird Park There is one in the Jurong Bird Park. one in the Botanic Gardens and one in Marina City Park . As part of their Science is everywhere program, The Singapore Science Centre together with the National Parks Board recently put up a series of sundials representing the planets. With Science Centre representing the sun, unique sculptures are placed at various locations around Singapore. The relative distance of these sculptures from the Science Centre represents the distances of each planet from the Sun. Please check out the map ! Four common types of sundials are the equatorial, armillary, horizontal and vertical sundials. Equatorial sundial Armillary Sundial at City Hall, Ruurlo, photo by Frans W. Maes. Horizontal sundial by Harriet James Vertical sundial by Harriet James For telling the time at night, you can use a nocturnal. Nocturnal Nocturnal The quadrant is a simple tool for determining latitude. Quadrant The astrolabe was made famous by Arab astronomers, and can be thought of as an analog astronomical computer. We discuss the difference between an astrolabe and a mariner's astrolabe. Astrolabe by Norman Greene Mariner's astrolabe by Norman Greene There's a lovely Persian astrolabe from 17th century at the Asian Civilisations Museum in Singapore . Brass astrolabe, 17th century, Persia, Asian Civilisations Museum's collection, Singapore One of the most fascinating of all astronomical instruments is the Antikythera mechanism . The Antikythera Mechanism is the name given to an astronomical calculating device, measuring about 32 by 16 by 10 cm, which was discovered in 1900 in a sunken ship just off the coast of Antikythera, an island between Crete and the Greek mainland. Several kinds of evidence point incontrovertibly to around 80 B.C. for the date of the shipwreck. Geoffrey Chaucer, the author of Canterbury Tales wrote a Treatise on the Astrolabe in 1391. We then look at the cross-staff and the back staff. Cross-staff Backstaff We will compare the relative advantages of the quadrant, mariner's astrolabe and cross-staff. Quadrant Mariner's astrolabe Cross-staff The Chinese astronomer Guō Shǒujìng (郭守敬,1231-1314) designed many outstanding instruments. We will look at some of the famous observatories in China and India. Dengfeng Observatory, designed by Guō Shǒujìng (郭守敬,1231-1314) in 1276 Armillary spheres at the Purple Mountain Observatory in Nanjing designed by Guō Shǒujìng (郭守敬,1231-1314) We study the armillary spheres made by the Danish astronomer Tycho Brahe (1546-1601). (My second cousin lives in a castle built by a nephew of Tycho Brahe!) You will learn the difference between an ecliptic armillary sphere and an equatorial armillary sphere. I also have a separate page about Armillary Spheres . Ecliptic armillary sphere Equatorial armillary sphere How were cathedrals used as solar observatories? We study meridian lines in European churches. I have created a separate page on meridian lines, A Guide to The Sun in the Church by J.L. Heilbron . Meridian Line. S. Petronio, Bologna, Calter Photo Solar eclipse at the Meridian line at S.Maria degli Angeli in Rome by Mario Catamo The Ambassadors by Holbein is a famous example of Anamorphosis . Do you see the strange object on the floor? Close your left eye, put your face close to the computer screen near the right side of the picture. You will then see a skull! If you can't get it to work, you can cheat and look at a picture of it. The reason why I include this painting on this page, is because it contains an incredible collection of astronomical and mathematical instruments! Please check out my page about The Ambassadors by Holbein . The Ambassadors (1533), by Hans Holbein the Younger (1497/8 - 1543) Ancient Astronomical Instruments Undergraduate research project on Calendars, Interpolation, Gnomons and Armillary Spheres in the Work of Guo Shoujing (1231-1314) by my student Ng Say Tiong. Medieval science scientific instruments by Richard A. Paselk, Department of Chemistry, Humboldt State University. Astronomical Instruments . Tycho Brahe (1546-1601) Tycho Brahe - official website . The astronomical instruments of Tycho Brahe . Dansk Astronomi gennem 400 år , 400 years of Danish Astronomy (in Danish). Brian Greig is going to make models of Tycho's armillary spheres for me. Sundials Undergraduate research project on The Mathematics of Sundials by my students Liew Huay Ling and Lim Siew Yee. Sundials on the Internet . North American Sundial Society . The British Sundial Society . Sundials on the Internet - Four simple sundial projects for you to make . Sundials by Jack Aubert. sundial links by Daniel Roth. Analemmatic Sundials Of Analemmas, Mean Time, and the Analemmatic Sundial by Frederick W. Sawyer III. Make your own Sundial from the Hartebeesthoek Radio Astronomy Observatory. Analemmatic Sundials: How to build one and why they work by C.J. Budd and C.J. Sangwin of the University of Bath. Moondials Make your own Moondial . Nocturnals Pocket Sundial, Star Clock, star time by Keith Powell. Shepherd's Watch makes a nice nocturnal. They also make nice sundials, but notice that their Explorer model does not adjust for the season, only for the latitude. Celestial globe made for the Beijing Observatory by Ferdinand Verbiest (1673) Celestial Star Globe Celestial Globes Celestial Star Globe . Astrolabes astrolabes.org . Keith's astrolabes: a Java program . A Treatise on the Astrolabe Geoffrey Chaucer, 1391 . Clockworks: Astrolabe from Britannica.com. Astrolabes by Norman Greene . Martin Brunold - Astrolabienmacher The Antikythera mechanism The Antikythera Mechanism I by Tony Phillips with Java animations by Bill Casselman . The Antikythera Mechanism II by Tony Phillips with Java animations by Bill Casselman The large Samyat Yantra, equatorial sundial, at Jaipur Drawing of the small equatorial sundial showing the shadow, quadrants, gnomon, and Sun rays Jaipur Observatory Jantar Mantar: The Astronomical Observatories of Jai Singh II by Barry Perlus, Department of Art at Cornell University, is an absolutely stunning spherical VR imaging project. Jaipur - Jantar Mantar . 18th Century Observatories of Maharaja Sawai Jai Singh II by C. Hartley, Director of the Ernest B. Wright Observatory at Hartwick College. Back to top of page Astrology Does astrology make sense? I'm personally skeptical. In the past, however, there was a close relationship between astronomy and astrology, and astronomy has great historical interest. We look at the mathematical foundation of some of the key concepts in both Western and Chinese astrology. 15th century French woodcut What do astrologers mean when they say that somebody has an Aries ascendant? In order to understand this, we study the division of the ecliptic into houses. This is a very difficult issue, especially in high latitudes. Astrology Undergraduate research project on The Mathematics of Astrology: Does House Division Make Sense? by my student Kevin Heng Ser Guan. Your Astrology Defense Kit by Andrew Fraknoi. Skeptic's Dictionary astrology . SC/BC 1800C.03 - Analysis of Astrology FAQ Page collected and edited by M.M. De Robertis (Instructor) at York University. The Astrotest, A tough match for astrologers by Rob Nanninga. Skeptical Information Links: Astrology by Jim Lippard. Astrology Science . Back to top of page Navigation Why is it harder to find your position at sea than at land? We study how ancient sailors in different parts of the world navigated in different ways, and how technological advances opened up new possibilities for discoveries and trade. Cross-staff used for computing lunar distance and height of buildings on the cover of Introductio geographica by Petrus Apianus, Ingolstadt, 1533 Why is it harder to determine the longitude than the latitude? In 1714 the British Parliament offered 20,000 pound to anybody who could come up with a practical method to determine the longitude at sea. That was the equivalent of US$12 million in modern money! The Astronomer Royal was only paid 100 pounds a year, and had to pay for his own instruments. We will watch the movie Longitude , starring Jeremy Irons, which is based on the best-selling book Longitude: The True Story of a Lone Genius Who Solved the Greatest Scientific Problem of His Time by Dava Sobel. The movie is very interesting, and includes famous names like Jeremy Irons , Michael Gambon , Bill Nighy , Ian Hart and Gemma Jones . Why is it harder to find your position in an air plane than at sea? We look at some modern methods, including GPS. General Navigation An honours project on The Mathematics of the Longitude by my student Wong Lee Nah. Henning Umland has a wonderful Short guide to celestial navigation . Celestial Navigation Net is one of my favorite sites. Very comprehensive! Celestial Navigation by Al Placette. Harrison's 4th Timekeeper and Longitude prize-winner Finding the Longitude NOVA Online Lost at Sea The Search for Longitude . John Harrison and the Longitude Problem from The Royal Observatory Greenwich. General History of Navigation The Columbus Navigation Homepage by Keith A. Pickering. Determination of Latitude by Francis Drake on the Coast of California in 1579 by Bob Graham. The Viking Sun Compass by Franck Pettersen, Northern Lights Planetarium, Tromsø, Norway. From the Planetarian . The Mariners' Museum Age of Exploration . Wayfinders: A Pacific Odyssey on PBS. John Charles Fremont by Bob Graham. Danish high school students working on a navigation project On-line Navigation Tools Bowditch -The American Practical Navigator . On Line Nautical Almanac from Navigator Light Software . Back to top of page Cartography Most capital cities have a geographical origin of coordinates, which is used when making maps for the country. All cities also have a zero point for road distances from the city center to other points. Why do capital cities need an origin of coordinates? In the past, finding coordinates, especially the longitude, was so hard that the best way was to pick a local origin, do astronomical observations at that point, and then do triangulation for the rest of the country. That's why the origin of coordinates is often at observatories. In London the origin of coordinates is at Greenwich, while the zero point for road distances is at Trafalgar Square. In Oslo the origin of coordinates is at the Observatory, while the zero point for road distances is at Stortorvet. But what about Singapore? After a bit of detective work, and a lot of help from various people, I found that the origin of coordinates is at Empress Place and the zero point for road distances is at the old General Post Office, now the Fullerton Hotel. For more details, see my page on Where is the Geographical Origin of Coordinates of Singapore? How big is the Earth? We look at Eratosthenes's solution to this problem. Did people in the Middle Ages believe that the Earth was flat? Why is there no perfect map? We define the curvature of a surface and show that the curvature of the Earth is positive while the curvature of the plane is zero. Mercator's 1569 world map Mercator map of the world attributed to Edward Wright (1599) Modern Mercator map What makes the Mercator projection so important in navigation? We study the geometry of rhumb lines. We also show how it is related to the invention of logarithms. Cartography Cynthia Lanius' Lessons: The Mathematics of Cartography from Rice University. Map Projection Home Page from the Geography Department, Hunter College, City University of New York. Map Projection Overview by Peter H. Dana, Department of Geography, University of Colorado, Boulder. Mathematical Cartography by Hans Havlicek, Abteilung für Lineare Geometrie, Technische Universität Wien. This is NOT a medieval woodcut! The Flat Earth Myth This is NOT a medieval woodcut! by Kerry Magruder. The Myth of the Flat Earth by Jeffrey Burton Russell. Back to top of page Archaeoastronomy Was Stonehenge an observatory? When were the pyramids of Egypt built? Archaeoastronomy is a very active area these days. Many ancient monuments reveal an astronomical background. Newgrange Stonehenge Stonehenge Visit Stonehenge : English Heritage Science and Stonehenge from English Heritage. How They Rebuilt Stonehenge Winter Solstice Sunrise at Newgrange Winter Solstice Sunrise at Maeshowe Newgrange and Maeshowe Newgrange Megalithic Passage Tomb - Ireland has a great animation showing how the passageway is illuminated by the sunrise at the Winter solstice. Winter Solstice at Newgrange (http://members.theglobe.com/newgrange2/solstice.html). (Broken link. Can anybody please help?) Geniet Heaven and earth contains both Geniet: Newgrange and Geniet Research on Maes Howe, Orkney, UK . Maeshowe and the Winter Solstice . Pyramids General Archaeoastronomy The Center for Archaeoastronomy at the University of Maryland. Back to top of page Astronomical instruments in the Imperial Observatory in Beijing made by the Jesuit missionary Ferdinand Verbiest, 1670 Cultural Astronomy What is with the Singapore flag? Why is the coat of arms more correct? I have a page on The Mathematics and Astronomy of the Singapore Flag . The Singapore Flag The Singapore Coat of Arms What is a Harvest Moon? What is a Blue Moon? What is Groundhog Day? There are a lot astronomical terms that people use but don't really understand. What was the Star of Bethlehem? How can eclipses be used to date historical events? Chaucer wrote a book on the astrolabe, and the Canterbury Tales are filled with astronomical references. Celestial Navigation Net has a very interesting section on Dante and Celestial Navigation! Donald Olson and others have championed a new field called forensic astronomy. A nice example of this is Astronomers turn detectives to pinpoint date of Ansel Adams image . What is a Blue Moon? What's a Blue Moon? by Donald W. Olson, Richard Tresch Fienberg, and Roger W. Sinnott. The definite article from Sky Telescope magazine. Sky Telescope no longer has a free archive, but you can look it up in a library. You can also search for the earlier articles Once in a Blue Moon by Philip Hiscock and Blue-Moon Mystery Solved? by Donald W. Olson and Roger W. Sinnott from Sky Telescope . What is a Harvest Moon? Watch Out for the Harvest Moon from SpaceScience.com. The Harvest Moon by Larry Gedney. From Alaska Science Forum. The Star of Bethlehem What was the Star of Bethlehem? - Mysteries of the Universe- msnbc.com Star of Bethlehem by Donald Simanek. Common Errors in Star of Bethlehem Planetarium Shows by John Mosley, Program Supervisor, Griffith Observatory. From the Planetarian . Yet Another Eclipse for Herod by John P. Pratt. From the Planetarian . The Bimillenary of Christ's Birth: The Astronomical Evidence by William P. Bidelman, Warner and Swasey Observatory, Case Western Reserve University. From the Planetarian . Phil the groundhog Groundhog Day Groundhog Day and Chinese Astronomy by Kelley L. Ross. Groundhog Day History from Stormfax . Groundhog.org - the Official Site of the Punxsutawney Groundhog Club . Back to top of page Astronomy in Nature I have a separate page on What Does the Waxing or Waning Moon Look Like in Different Parts of the World? This is a complex question that confuses many people. Moonrise from Sky Telescope What does the orbit of the Moon around the Sun look like? Most people, even almost all mathematicians I've asked this question, tend to believe that it will have loops and look something like the picture below. In fact it looks like this picture! It is not a circle, but is close to a 12-gon with rounded corners. It is locally convex in the sense that it has no loops and the curvature never changes sign. I have a page that explains why The Orbit of the Moon around the Sun is Convex! Halls Harbour, Nova Scotia, six hours apart Why are there two high tides each day? This is very frequently asked question! I used to think that the answer was simple, but after looking around in the library and on the web, I discovered several different attempts at explaining it. Newton's equilibrium theory from 1687 used the differential of the gravitational force, but some people (especially oceanographers) also consider a centrifugal force caused by the rotation of the Earth around the Earth-Moon barycenter. Unfortunately, it seems to me that the methods using a centrifugal force are unnecessarily complicated, if not outright wrong! I will describe some of the attempted explanations I found. How often can we see lunar and solar eclipses in Singapore? It turns out that it is fairly easy to make reasonably accurate eclipse predictions. There are several solar eclipses each year, but at a given place, they occur on average only every 360 years. Solar eclipses, Singapore lists all solar eclipses visible from Singapore between 1700 and 2100. The last total eclipse was in 1821, and there will be annular eclipses in 2019 and 2053, but I'm afraid there will not be any total eclipses in Singapore before 5 July 2168. How is astronomy related to the ice ages? It turns out that changes in the Earth's movement is related to the ice ages. Why does the Moon look bigger when it is near the horizon? Can you balance an egg on the Spring equinox? This turns out to be related to the Chinese calendar ! Eclipses In October 1995 I went with Professor John Parkinson to Sabah to watch a total solar eclipse. The Singapore Science Centre has a nice Skytrack site and info about eclipses in Singapore , including a list of lunar eclipses (excluding penumbral eclipses) visible in Singapore between 1995 and 2015 . singastro.org is good for local astronomy info including eclipses. Solar eclipses, Singapore lists all solar eclipses visible from Singapore between 1700 and 2100. Eclipse Reference List from the Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory . Eclipses Online Portal . NASA has a nice Eclipse Home Page , which includes a very useful Javascript Lunar Eclipse Explorer . It can compute the local circumstances for every lunar eclipse visible from a city for any century from -1999 to 3000 (2000 BCE to 3000 CE). There is a nice animation of a lunar eclipse at NASA and a nice picture at UK Eclipse Group website . Astronomy and Climate The Seasons and the Earth's Orbit from the Astronomical Applications Department of the U.S. Naval Observatory . What's Wrong With This Moon? The Moon What's Wrong With This Moon? by Jim Loy. The Moon by Jim Loy. Bad Moons Rising from Paper Plate Education . The Moon Illusion Moon illusion from Wikipedia . Explaining the Moon illusion by Lloyd Kaufman, and James H. Kaufman. Back to top of page Bad Astronomy and Pseudoscience The truth may be out there, but there's a lot of crap, too! I will discuss some common misconceptions and hoaxes. One of my favorites is the Mars will be as big at the Full Moon e-mail. It has several variations, but here is a common one. The Red Planet is about to be spectacular! This month and next, Earth is catching up with Mars in an encounter that will culminate in the closest approach between the two planets in recorded history. The next time Mars may come this close is in 2287. Due to the way Jupiter's gravity tugs on Mars and perturbs its orbit, astronomers can only be certain t! hat Mars has not come this close to Earth in the Last 5,000 years, but it may be as long as 60,000 years before it happens again. The encounter will culminate on August 27th when Mars comes to within 34,649,589 miles of Earth and will be (next to the moon) the brightest object in the night sky. It will attain a magnitude of -2.9 and will appear 25.11 arc seconds wide. At a modest 75-power magnification Mars will look as large as the full moon to the naked eye. Mars will be easy to spot. At the beginning of August it will rise in the east at 10p.m. and reach its azimuth at about 3 a.m. By the end of August when the two planets are closest, Mars will rise at nightfall and reach its highest point in the sky at 12:30a.m. That's pretty convenient to see something that no human being has seen in recorded history. So, mark your calendar at the beginning of August to see Mars grow progressively brighter and brighter throughout the month. Share this with your children and grandchildren. NO ONE ALIVE TODAY WILL EVER SEE THIS AGAIN! Does this make you think that Mars will be as big as the Full Moon in the sky? That's NOT what they're saying, but you have to read carefully to not get tricked. Balancing Eggs on the Spring Equinox Standing an egg on end on the Spring Equinox from Phil Plait's Bad Astronomy site. This is related to the Chinese calendar ! Kepler's Mysterium Cosmographicum, 1596 Back to top of page Lecture Notes The first part of the course gives a basic introduction to spherical astronomy. Here are the slides from the lectures. Introduction Week 1 Week 2 Week 3 Week 4 Week 5 Week 6 I have a brief set of notes on The Celestial Sphere . They are useful for the first part of the course. I have written a paper on Heavenly Mathematics: Observing the Sun and the Moon from Different Parts of the World. The first part is useful for the first part of the course. The part about the analemma is for the end of course when we talk about time and navigation. The second part of the course is about calendars. I have a set of lecture notes on The Mathematics of the Public Holidays of Singapore . I will follow these quite closely. I have a long paper on The Mathematics of the Chinese Calendar . This is just for optional reading, but you may enjoy looking at it, especially Section 2 and 3. The last part of the course is about time and navigation. I have a brief set of notes on Celestial Navigation and the Equation of Time . Slides for Week 10 We will finally talk about the last part of my paper on Heavenly Mathematics: Observing the Sun and the Moon from Different Parts of the World. (Same link as above.) Back to top of page Homework and Tutorials Homework Homework Tutorials Tutorial 1 Solutions Tutorial 2 Solutions Tutorial 3 Solutions Tutorial 4 Solutions Tutorial 5 Solutions Tutorial 6 Solutions Tutorial 7 Solutions Tutorial 8 Solutions Tutorial 9 Solutions Tutorial 10 Solutions Back to top of page Old Exams Exam 2003/04 Semester 1 , Solutions Exam 2005/06 Semester 1 , Solutions Exam 2005/06 Semester 2 , Solutions Exam 2006/07 Semester 2 , Solutions Exam 2007/08 Semester 2 , Solutions Exam 2008/09 Semester 2 , Solutions Exam 2009/10 Semester 1 , Solutions Exam 2010/11 Semester 1 , Solutions Back to top of page Summary A brief summary of some of the main points. Armillary sphere at the Purple Mountain Observatory in Nanjing designed by Guō Shǒujìng (郭守敬,1231-1314) Armillary sphere at the Purple Mountain Observatory in Nanjing designed by Guō Shǒujìng (郭守敬,1231-1314) Back to top of page Past Homework I have a separate page for past homework . Back to top of page Past Projects Before 2009, students did a project. I have a separate page for past projects . Back to top of page References I have a separate web page with references . Back to top of page Adam Schall (1591-1666), Imperial Astronomer in Beijing Armillary sphere Good-bye! Congratulations! You've made it to the end of my page! Thanks for your patience! But before you go, it's time for a little quiz. In the picture of Adam Schall above, can you name the five astronomical and three geometrical instruments in the picture? Can you tell what is wrong with one of them? Hint: Look at the picture on the right. I have included answers . I hope you have found something of interest. That makes my efforts worthwhile. Feel free to send me a message . And remember, if life is hard, do like the sundial: Count only the bright hours! Back to top of page Helmer Aslaksen Department of Mathematics National University of Singapore helmer.aslaksencom Web Server Statistics for Helmer Aslaksen , produced by Analog . I use the W3C MarkUp Validation Service and the W3C Link Checker . 
 Astronomical Society Donate to Support Science Literacy facebook twitter youtube ASP Publications for a variety of audiences READ MORE ABOUT US ASP Staff Awards Board Contact Events FAQ History News RESOURCES EDUCATION Amateur Astronomy ASP Annual Meeting Astronomy Resource Guides Astronomy Travel K-12 Educators Parks Museums Programs SOFIA GET INVOLVED ASP Membership ASP Member Portal Astronomy Clubs Corporate Partners Give for Today Give for Tomorrow Internships Partner with the ASP Volunteer ASP PUBLICATIONS Annual Report Astronomy Beat Conference Series ASP Monograph Publications Mercury Magazine Newsletter PASP Universe in the Classroom SHOP THE ASTROSHOP CAN'T FIND WHAT YOU'RE LOOKING FOR? Universe in the Classroom Welcome to the Universe in the Classroom ! This electronic educational newsletter is for teachers and other educators around the world who want to help students of all ages learn more about the wonders of the universe through astronomy. You can read the current issue, subscribe to receive updates and browse our archives . You can also learn more about the Universe in the Classroom and find out about how you can help by writing an article, translating the newsletter or making a donation. Current Issue: Winter 2014 The Universe: the 2014 Model Part 1. The Hot Big Bang and its Consequences by Bruce Partridge (Haverford College) In the past few decades, we have made huge strides in understanding what the Universe is like, and how it evolved. In fact, this is a vast understatement! Fifty years ago, we knew the Universe was expanding, and had a rough idea of its age, somewhere between 7 and 20 billion years. There was a lively debate on whether the expansion was slowing down or not. There were hints—which most astronomers ignored— that some kind of matter was present in the Universe other than stars and galaxies. Very little else was agreed on, and a prominent physicist dismissed cosmology, the study of the properties and history of the Universe, as “a dream of zealots.” In this edition of Universe in the Classroom, learn about how our understanding of cosmology has evolved as our ability to collect and interpret data has improved. We thank the following Universe in the Classroom sponsors Donat G. Wentzel The Thomason Foundation Al Whaley Support this program . Related Content About Universe in the Classroom Educational Resources Family ASTRO Galileo Educator Network Galileo Teacher Training Program K-12 Educators Project ASTRO SF Bay Area Project ASTRO The Universe at Your Fingertips 2.0 Universe in the Classroom Archives Universe in the Classroom: How You Can Help Stellar Tweets Follow Us Current Events More in Events Society News The Astronomical Society of the Pacific (ASP) is pleased to announce the appointment of Dr. Linda Shore to the position of Executive Director. Exploratorium . While there she led a staff of scientists and educators, and created nationally recognized teaching programs. She was also responsible for fund development, grants program, and expanding institutional reach by forging collaborations with national and international museums and science centers. Shore has co-authored Exploratorium science and education books, and written articles about popular science and science education for the public. A native San Franciscan who has spent most of her life in the Bay Area, she holds a PhD in science education from Boston University, and a master’s degree in physics and astronomy from San Francisco State University. Shore was also the recipient of a prestigious Smithsonian Pre-doctoral Fellowship to work at the Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics where she developed curriculum and conducted research on astronomy learning for the National Science Foundation funded program, Project STAR (Science Teaching through its Astronomical Roots) ASP’s 125th Anniversary 125th year , the ASP is one of the most recognized and well-respected nonprofit astronomy organizations in the country. Boasting diverse national programs endorsed by NASA and the NSF, publications , and awards The ASP deeply mourns the January 10th passing of BYU astronomy professor Dr. Harold McNamara, who served as Editor of the science journal "Publications of the ASP" from 1968 to 2004. http://www.bergmortuary.com/obituaries/Delbert-Mcnamara/#!/Obituary http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/D._Harold_McNamara It is with profound sadness that the Astronomical Society of the Pacific reports the sudden death of its Board member and secretary, Dr. Michael G. Gibbs on December 10, 2013. http://www.mlive.com/news/flint/index.ssf/2013/12/dr_michael_g_gibbs_remembered.html More in News Sign Up for Email Updates MMXIV Astronomical Society of the Pacific 
 From Stargazers to Starships by David P. Stern Welcome! home page of a book-on-the-web, a coherent, self-contained course at the high-school level , also suitable for independent study, rich in history. A button at the end of each text file brings you back here. Its contents (full list further below) cover: I. Astronomy of the Earth's motion in space. II. Newtonian mechanics. III. The Sun VI. Spaceflight and spacecraft also .... an introduction for teachers A Math Refresher Helpful Material Glossary Questions and Answers A Timeline Items of interest to educators A set of Lesson Plans (NASA site) Objects and phenomena currently visible on the night sky Spanish by J. M. Mendez, H. Chvez, et al. French by Dr. Guy Batteur Italian by Giuliano Pinto here Volunteer translators for this site and related ones--please contact me (below). comments and questions . . . And if you are willing to become a collaborator , perhaps assume part of the responsibility for these web sites, please click here . More Links: An overview of this site and two sister sites: http://www.phy6.org/readfirst.htm "Zip archive" compressed version Beyond science: Welcome to my World Contents: Astronomy of the Earth's motion in space: Introduction to this part Stargazers and Skywatchers The Celestial Sphere Finding the Pole Star The Path of the Sun, the Ecliptic Building a Sundial Seasons of the Year The Angle of the Sun's Rays The Moon: the Distant View The Moon: A Closer Look Libration of the Moon Latitude and Longitude Navigation The Cross-Staff Coordinates The Calendar The Jewish Calendar (optional) Precession The Round Earth and Christopher Columbus Distance to the Horizon Parallax How Distant is the Moon?--1 How Distant is the Moon?--2 Aristarchus: Is Earth Revolving around the Sun? The Earth's Shadow The Planets The Solar System--General Overview ," February 2008 Links and Tables Mercury Venus Earth Mars Asteroids Jupiter Io and other Jupiter moons Saturn Telescopes Uranus Neptune Pluto and the Kuiper belt Comets and other small objects Copernicus, Galileo, and the Discovery of the Solar System Kepler's 3 Laws of Planetary Motion Guide Kepler and his Laws Kepler's 3rd law (Optional) The Scale of the Solar System Graphs and Ellipses Ellipses and Kepler's First Law Alien Planets Kepler's Second Law More on Kepler's Second Law How Orbital Motion is Calculated Optional: The 2004 Transit of Venus Halley's Method of Deriving the AU The displacement D of the track of Venus Deriving the Astronomical Unit Newtonian mechanics The Way Things Fall Vectors Energy Atmospheric Energy and Climate (optional) Newton and his Laws Mass Mass Measurements aboard Space Station Skylab Comparing Masses without the Use of Gravity Newtons Second Law Newtons Third Law Momentum Work Work against an Electric Force: The Van de Graaff Generator Motion in a Circle Newton's theory of "Universal Gravitation" Kepler's Third Law Applying Kepler's Third Law Optional: Spaceflight to Mars Flight to Mars: How Long? Along what Path? Flight to Mars: Calculations Flight to Mars: the Return Trip Frames of Reference: The Basics The Aberration of Starlight The Theory of Relativity Airplane Flight Airplane Flight: How high? How fast? (optional) Accelerated Frames of Reference: Inertial Forces Frames of Reference: The Centrifugal Force Loop-the-Loop (optional) The Rotating Earth Rotating Frames of Reference in Space and on Earth . The Sun and related Physics The Sun--Introduction How the Sun produces weather and climate Sunlight and the Earth Weather and the Atmosphere Global Climate, Global Wind flow Our View of the Sun The Magnetic Sun Interplanetary Magnetic Field Lines The Many Colors of Sunlight Experimenting with Colors Optional: The Doppler Effect The Velocity of Light Frequency Shifts and the Expanding Universe Rotating Galaxies and Dark Matter Waves and Photons Optional series of sections on Quantum Phenomena: Quantum Physics The Atomic Structure of Matter Atomic Energy Levels Planck's Constant: Radiation from Hot Objects The Atomic Nucleus and Bohr's Early Model of the Atom Expansion of the Bohr Model Wave Mechanics Quantum Tunneling Seeing the Sun in a New Light The Energy of the Sun Peripheral Subjects related to section S-7 above: The Discovery of Atoms and Nuclei (A very quick overview of the relevant history.) The Black Hole at the Center of our Galaxy Nuclear Power S-8A " Nuclear Energy --a more detailed overview" S-8A-0 0.Nuclear Energy--Summary S-8A-1 1.The Foundations: Atoms and Nuclei S-8A-2 2.Nuclear Binding Energy S-8A-3 3.Fission of Heavy Nuclei S-8A-4 4.Controlling the Nuclear Reaction using Thorium for nuclear fuel References, Questions and Answers Nuclear Weapons . Spaceflight and Spacecraft The Principle of the Rocket Robert Goddard and his Rockets The Evolution of the Rocket Spaceflight Spacecraft Satellites observing the Sun, solar system and the universe Satellites observing Earth from above Satellites which observe the local space environment Satellites for commercial benefits Missions to planets and distant space Far-out Pathways to Space: Great Guns? Project HARP and the Martlet Far-out Pathways to Space: Nuclear Power Far-out pathways to Space: Solar Sails Early Warning of Interplanetary Disturbances Ion Rockets Orbits in Space The Distance to the L1 Point The L4 and L5 Lagrangian Points The L4 and L5 Points--Another Derivation Starships Planetary Swing-by and the Pelton Turbine Afterword : "Do Frogs Exist there Too ?" A Math Refresher Home page Elements of algebra Basic ideas Algebra Proficiency Drill How it all started Formulas Identities Deriving Approximate Results (M-6) The Theorem of Pythagoras Elements of trigonometry What is it good for? How to tell sines from cosines Deriving sines and cosines Going past 90 degrees Deriving sin(), cos(). Trigonometry Proficiency Drill The Tangent Elements of logarithms Logarithms -- Introduction Powers of Numbers Raising one Power to Another Deriving Approximate Logarithms The number "e" Helpful Material back to top Questions and Answers (and oh, do we get questions!) Questions and Answers -- Listed in the order they were received. Hints to users . A Glossary of Terms (Cross-linked, keyed to the text) Annotated Timeline ( Chronology with links and added dates from history). Of special interest to teachers: back to top 'Stargazers' in the Classroom and National Science Education Standards Inventory of concepts, calculations and stories , by section. A list of problems related to the material. Additional Problems Using Space to Teach Physics (draft of article in The Physics Teacher , Feb.99) Kepler's 3 Laws of Planetary Motion Afterthoughts From Stargazers to Starships follows an earlier site The Exploration of the Earth's Magnetosphere . deals with the world of gravity --of massive planets and stars, and the way spaceflight is achieved despite their strong pull. Exploration" on the other hand looks at the hot (but usually rarefied) gases which fill most of space, which are ruled by magnetic and electric forces rather than by gravity. The polar aurora, the radiation belts, the solar wind, magnetic storms, "space weather", cosmic radiation--this is the site which tells you all about them. Author and Curator: Dr. David P. Stern stargaze ("at" symbol) phy6.org . Last updated: 2-25-2012 
 About us Research Graduate Programme Courses and Workshops Planetary Links Intranet (internal use only) Ibn Battuta Centre 
 Back to ASTRO UTAH Home Welcome to Project ASTRO UTAH Our Goals The Coalition The Schools Science Snippets Interesting Links Looking Around Astronomy Articles ASTRO UTAH Newsletter and funded by the National Science Foundation NASA . To date there are nine Project ASTRO UTAH Clark Foundation Project ASTRO UTAH Coalition Project ASTRO UTAH's goal is to enhance the fourteen Utah school districts The Clark Foundation . webmaster@clarkfoundation.org 
 putting the sky within your reach Software downloads Log in Help Joint programmes Noticeboard September 12, 2004 - The Astronomy In Your Hands Griffith Observatory Star Award More credits Accolades and awards Web site published by Magic Lantern , hosted by HilderBuild 
 skip to navigation . skip to content . DEPARTMENT OF PHYSICS AND ASTRONOMY FACULTY OF MATHEMATICAL AND PHYSICAL SCIENCES Physics and Astronomy Students Certificate in Astronomy Certificate in Astronomy Home Students Research Science for the Public Alumni Vacancies News & Events Students home Certificate in Astronomy home Why UCL? Fees & funding Term dates Careers Student intranet Certificate in Astronomy Introduction Course Structure Enquiries application Fees Dates ULO Observatory Royal Astronomical Society and can be used as supportive ground for applying for an RAS fellowship The Department Facilities at UCL Lecture Course Syllabus Two modules will be taught in each term, as follows: Click here Practical Sessions Astronomy Dissertations Provisional Syllabus for Lecture Courses YEAR ONE First Term Foundations of Astronomy Techniques in Astronomy Second Term The solar system The Sun and Stars YEAR TWO First Term Interstellar Astronomy Extra-solar planets and the search for life Second Term High-energy Astrophysics Extragalactic astronomy and cosmology Provisional Syllabus for Practical Courses YEARS ONE AND TWO Back to top Entry Requirements . How to apply? Notes for prospective students (pdf version). Dr Mike Dworetsky Department of Physics and Astronomy University College London Gower Street London WC1E 6BT General enquiries Department of Physics and Astronomy University College London tel: 020 7679 3943 e-mail: astrocert@ucl.ac.uk UK Students Fees Overseas Student Fees For citizens of the EC For non-EC nationals for further details. UCL Term Dates, 2014–2015 Lecture Classes at UCL will be on the following dates: The dates for 2014-2015 Practicals will be assigned later in the summer of 2014 when student numbers and staffing details are known.  Provisionally, we expect first and second year practicals to be on Wednesdays in Terms 1 and 2.  We usually plan for three groups for each year but final details depend on student numbers. *The final Group B sessions will be on the evening of Thursday 27 February and Monday March 10  to allow the full 48 sessions for Group B. Group A (Yr 1) Group B (Yr 1) not walk Review UCL? Observatory MAPS Faculty MAPS Site General Mrs Christine Johnston +44 (0)20 7679 3943 Enquiries Contact Information Find Us About Us Student Area Staff Area Disclaimer Freedom of Information Accessibility Privacy Cookies Advanced Search Contact Us Tel +44 (0)20 7679 7155 UCL 19992014 
 Principles of Astronomy is copyright protected, is the sole property of the author (Dr Jamie Love 1997 - 2011) and is sold exclusively by Merlin Science . Any form of reproduction by any media is strictly forbidden. Principles of Astronomy Principles of Astronomy created by Dr Jamie Love Welcome to your astronomy lessons. January February March First Quarter Exams April May June Second Quarter Exams July August September Third Quarter Exams October November December Fourth Quarter Exams Principles of Astronomy's Study Guide , the list of terms learned and the list of astronomical objects taught January Introduction to the Course (Check the study guide for this lesson Getting Your Bearings (Check the study guide for this lesson The Earth's Motion (Check the study guide for this lesson Optical Devices (Check the study guide for this lesson February Star Names and Brightness (Check the study guide for this lesson The Moon's Motion (Check the study guide for this lesson The Phases of the Moon (Check the study guide for this lesson You'll learn how the relative positions of the Earth, Moon and Sun The Lunar Landscape (Check the study guide for this lesson March Star Colors and Temperatures (Check the study guide for this lesson Color Designation and the Hertzsprung-Russell Diagram (Check the study guide for this lesson The Positions of the Planets (Check the study guide for this lesson The Motion of the Planets (Check the study guide for this lesson April The Birth of Stars (Check the study guide for this lesson Star Clusters (Check the study guide for this lesson Star Physics (Check the study guide for this lesson In this lesson I will teach you how a star creates its power by fusing atoms together. I'll also introduce you to the Eddington limit, a simple relationship that tells you how bright a star can really be. Some students may find this lesson difficult and be frightened by the equations but you don't need to understand all these details. I'm just presenting it because it is of interest to many folks and is NOT beyond the ability of most people to understand. Please give it a try. You may be a budding astrophysicist and not even know it! Star Structure and Spectroscopy (Check the study guide for this lesson Stars are not simply balls of gas. They have a structure that defines how they work and affects their surface appearance. In this lesson I will show you the anatomy of a star, using the Sun May Aging Stars and Red Giants (Check the study guide for this lesson Planetary Nebula and White Dwarfs (Check the study guide for this lesson All stars eventually die. After old age, as a red giant, our Sun Spring Stars and Constellations (Check the study guide for this lesson The Earth's Aurora (Check the study guide for this lesson Here I will teach you about the beautiful, spooky and lights that visit our night sky. (No, no - not flying saucers! ) The auroras are caused by a combination of the Sun 's solar winds and the Earth's magnetic field. In this lesson you will learn about this important area of astrophysics. This will extend your knowledge about the Sun June Supernovas and Neutron Stars (Check the study guide for this lesson Pulsars (Check the study guide for this lesson Black Holes (Check the study guide for this lesson Orbits (Check the study guide for this lesson July Eclipses (Part 1) (Check the study guide for this lesson Eclipses (Part 2) (Check the study guide for this lesson Multiple Star Systems (Check the study guide for this lesson Multiple Star Systems and Novas (Check the study guide for this lesson August The Formation of our Solar System and Long Period Comets (Check the study guide for this lesson Short Period Comets and Comets in General (Check the study guide for this lesson Meteors and Asteroids (Check the study guide for this lesson The Late Summer Night Sky (Check the study guide for this lesson September The Tilt of a Planet's Rotation (Check the study guide for this lesson The Path of the Sun in our Sky (Check the study guide for this lesson The tilt of the Earth causes the path of the Sun The Milky Way Galaxy (Check the study guide for this lesson The Local Group (of Galaxies) (Check the study guide for this lesson October Classification of Galaxies (Check the study guide for this lesson Structure, Evolution and Dynamics of Galaxies (Check the study guide for this lesson The Zodiac (Check the study guide for this lesson Celestial Coordinates (Check the study guide for this lesson November Strange Galaxies (Check the study guide for this lesson Precession of the Earth (Check the study guide for this lesson As if the world weren't complicated enough, now we come to precession! This important concept will not affect your astronomical observations but every astronomy student should understand how this slow wobble of the Earth will cause Polaris Distances in Space (Check the study guide for this lesson We have covered a lot of distance in this course - billions of light-years! Movement in Space (Check the study guide for this lesson December The Winter Southern Sky (Check the study guide for this lesson The Extreme Southern Celestial Hemisphere (Check the study guide for this lesson In this lesson we take the big plunge south and show you some sights you cannot see from North America or Europe. However, you should be aware of some of these most important sights because the wonder down under includes our nearest neighbor ( Alpha Centauri The Expanding Universe (Check the study guide for this lesson Cosmology (Check the study guide for this lesson Drop me an email at astro@synapses.co.uk Dr Jamie Love Principles of Astronomy is copyright protected, is the sole property of the author (Dr Jamie Love 1997 - 2011) and is sold exclusively by Merlin Science . Any form of reproduction by any media is strictly forbidden. Principles of Astronomy Free Hit Counter 
 StarrySkies Network Explore Mars with Stargazing Live Chile Inaugurates Worlds Most Powerful Space Telescope Is there life on Mars? Why the question still eludes us after years of discovery Monarch Butterfly Population Falls To Record Low, Mexican Scientists Say Cape Cod Storm Damage Seen From Space With NASA Bake Sale, Planetary Fundraisers Go Old School Boulder planetary scientists to shine shoes Saturday to highlight budget cuts Einstein was right, neutrino researchers admit Saturn moon spouts plasma unlike any seen before ONLY TWO COSMIC DOOMSDAYS ARE CERTAIN Youre Invited to Attend the “Save Our Science” Event June 9 Editorial: NASAs future is a future worth funding Future Shock: M31 to Hit Milky Way Head-On Craters serve as a Martian chronicle Aliens calling? Send in the robots! Mars crater shows evidence for climate evolution PEERING INTO THE DUSTY HEART OF CENTAURUS A Some newfound planets are something else Set Phasers to Smash: Shuttle Enterprise Damaged In Transit NASA kills X-ray telescope, blames projects cost Constellations 88 Constellations Sky Charts Spring Skies Summer Skies Autumn/Winter Skies North Polar South Polar Indulge your curiosity: Try this! The Solar System The Sun Asteroids Comets Mercury Venus Earth Mars Jupiter Saturn Uranus Neptune Pluto Happy 10th Birthday ISS! ISS 10th Anniversary Image Gallery. Why are all the planets spinning in the Solar System? why things rose, moved across the sky and set below the horizon. Help may come a bit sooner for Hubble The Starry Messenger article Galileo's Telescope Observations, and the Name of our Newsletter How Long Will the Sun Shine? How Long Will the Sun Shine? How Fast does the Earth Move? why it's rotating in the first place. Don't Miss Comet Holmes this particular one seems to defy all the usual traits of comets - you'll want to see it just the same! Solar Array Tear Mars Perfect Day solar blanket ripping The Many Faces of the Big Dipper Big Dipper The Primal and Future Moon in the past, things were much different, and they are still changing. STS-120 Image Gallery Just About Everything You Wanted to Know about Fog The Nile Legacy The Legacy of the Milky Way Viewing the Space Shuttle and International Space Station from Earth Atlantis Returns to Pad Hail: When Hard Rains Fall Six Tornado Tips that could save your Life What the Big Dipper Can Tell You Gazing at the Crescent Earth? The Color of Water The Salty Seas Questions and Misconceptions about the Earth Lifestyles of the Stars How much do You know about Lightning? The Survival of Green Things Moon Tales: When the Moon saved the Sun - New York 1835 Doing the Dew Watches and Warnings Dippers in the Sky By the Light, of the Silvery (waxing, or waning) moon? The Mystery Of The Seventh Sisters The Star Stories of Thailand Tracking the Sun Buying a piece of the Sun, Moon and Stars! In the Eye of the Beholder The Women in the Moon StarrySkies.com Join Our Weekly Newsletter The Starry Messenger The Lure of Mars Mars is easy to observe Brighter Sun, Darker Earth Valles Marineris Driving to the Stars Looking for a Good Book? StarrySkies Bookstore . Search StarryGoogle Search starryskies.com Search starryskies.net Search starrymessenger.net ... @starryskies.com URL reveals our email address after you solve a reCAPTCHA (image containing two words). Privacy Policy 
 Home About Countries Projects Software Telescopes Conference GHOU 2014 GHOU 2014 Global Hands On Universe Conference GHOU Conference Network and Share the Knowledge Telescopes Tour the Universe from Your Desktop GTTP Training Teachers Blog Welcome to Global Hands On Universe blog. You will find whats latest at GHOU, news from our partners, stories from our collaborators around the world and conference updates. Blog Archive Donate Your contribution will help towards keeping GHOU active with its projects and programs around the world. Please consider making a donation to support GHOU. Thank you! contribute Software GHOU provides an excellent set of software for teachers, educators and students around the world. These are field tested and user-friendly and free to be use for educational purposes. read more Hands-On Universe (HOU) is an educational program that enables students to investigate the Universe while applying tools and concepts from science, math, and technology. Global Hands-On Universe (GHOU) joins efforts from all around the world to train teachers on the use of modern tools and resources for science education and engage students in international scientific projects. GHOU 2013 Conference Program Volos Photos Blog GHOU Home About Countries Projects Software Telescopes Conference GHOU 2014 Recent tweets @galileoteachers Global Astronomy Month 2014 is coming. Take part and celebrate astronomy for a whole month: http://t.co/lSYX2gV3r3 #GAM2014 7 hours ago Galileoteachers LIVE: ODS Webinar Share Your GTTP ODS Summer School 2014 GalileoMobile in India Go-Lab Contest Wake Up Rosetta Winners Contact Largo dos Topázios, 48, 3 Frt 2785-817 S. D. Rana Portugal E-Mail: info@handsonuniverse.org Web: http://handsonuniverse.org Facebook YouTube Back to Top 
 Observatorio ARVAL Bienvenido a nuestro sitio de Astronomía! Sobre las Páginas en el Web del Observatorio ARVAL Observatorio ARVAL : Andrés Valencia y Arnaldo Arnal. Breve Historia del Observatorio ARVAL Dot TK Observatorio ARVAL Cielos Claros! Welcome to our Astronomy site! About the Web Pages of Observatorio ARVAL Observatorio ARVAL : Andrés Valencia and Arnaldo Arnal. A short History of Observatorio ARVAL Dot TK Observatorio ARVAL Clear Skies! ARVAL que contienen las palabras que le interesan, Search ARVAL 's site containing the words you are interested in, Search Loading Contenido (Contents): Carl Sagan, 1934 - 1996 Castellano English Clyde Tombaugh, 1906 - 1997 Castellano English Astronomía Caraqueña - Eventos y Efemérides del Sistema Solar Notas Cartas Celestes para el Inicio y Centro de las Cuatro Estaciones del Año (en Los Cielos de Caracas Meteorología para Caracas, Venezuela, y el Caribe Astronomy for South Florida (with "Fair Weather Astronomy" for South-Miami) Meteorology for South Florida and the Caribbean Astro Links Observatorio ARVAL , frecuentemente actualizado. Observatorio ARVAL Galería de Imágenes Espacio Profundo, Vía Láctea, Sistema Solar Más recientes: Misión Planck Muestra el Universo en Foco Nítido Los Grandes Observatorios de NASA Encuentran Candidata para La Galaxia Más Lejana Conocida Mapa Detallado de Materia Oscura Genera Pistas sobre el Crecimiento de los Cúmulos de Galaxias HST: Pilar de Gas en la Nebulosa de Carina Image Gallery Deep Space, Milky Way, Solar System Most recent: Planck Mission Brings Universe Into Sharp Focus NASA Great Observatories Find Candidate for Most Distant Galaxy Yet Known Detailed Dark Matter Map Yields Clues to Galaxy Cluster Growth HST: Gas Pillar in the Carina Nebula Catálogo ARVAL de Objetos Brillantes - ARVAL Catalog of Bright Objects Addenda: Datos del Sistema Solar Solar System Data Satélites Clásicos del Sistema Solar Classic Satellites of the Solar System Mapa Lunar - Nueva edición Moon Map - New edition El Cielo de Orión The Sky of Orion Bucles en el Cielo: El Movimiento de los Planetas Loops in the Sky: The Movement of the Planets Eclipses Totales o Anulares de Sol en América del Sur (1951-2020) Total or Annular Sun Eclipses in South America (1951-2020) Mapa Topográfico de Venezuela Topographic Map of Venezuela Mapa de Relieve de Venezuela Relief Map of Venezuela Mapa Lumínico de Venezuela Luminic Map of Venezuela Mapa Lumínico de Florida Luminic Map of Florida Mapa Lumínico de Europa Luminic Map of Europe Páginas Técnicas: Technical Pages: Colimando Ópticas Newtonianas Collimating Newtonian Optics Colimación y Prueba de Estrella Collimation and Star Test Limpieza de Superficies Ópticas Cleaning Optical Surfaces Observación de Ocultaciones Observing Occultations Alineación Polar (con Polaris) para Telescopios con Montura Ecuatorial Polar Alignment (with Polaris) for Equatorial Telescopes SCAS-FIU version Alineación Polar (sin Polaris) para Telescopios con Montura Ecuatorial Polar Alignment (without Polaris) for Equatorial Telescopes Alineación Polar de un telescopio Meade LXD55/75 con Autostar Polar Alignment for Meade LXD55/75 Autostar telescopes Astrofotografía con la Cámara Digital Meade LPI Astrophotography with the Meade LPI Digital Camera Astrofotografía con el Refractor Meade 127ED APO y la Cámara Digital Canon EOS Astrophotography with the Meade 127ED APO Refractor and the Canon EOS Digital Camera Conferencias (Conferences): Astronomía Visual Básica en Blanco y Negro Basic Visual Astronomy in Black and White Cambio Climático ("Calentamiento Global"?) en Blanco y Negro Climate Change ("Global Warming"?) in Black and White La Hipótesis del Termostato (Willis Eschenbach) en Blanco y Negro The Thermostat Hypothesis (Willis Eschenbach) in Black and White Noticias Desde el Borde - Lee Smolin y la Gravedad Cuántica News from the Edge - Lee Smolin and Quantum Gravity Cuadernos de Información sobre Astronomía General Royal Greenwich Observatory (RGO) Último Cuaderno: Respuestas a todas sus preguntas acerca del Inicio del Nuevo Milenio General Astronomy Information Leaflets Royal Greenwich Observatory (RGO) Final Feature: Answers to all your questions about the Start of the New Millennium Información de Fondo Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) Más reciente: Constante de Hubble Refinada Restringe Posibles Explicaciones para la Energía Oscura Background Information Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) Most recent: Refined Hubble Constant Narrows Possible Explanations for Dark Energy Starman The definitive comic strip of Astronomy, by Jay Ryan Final Feature: Winter Qué hora es en Venezuela? - What time is it in Venezuela? Hora Atlántica en U.S.A. = Tiempo Universal Coordinado (UTC) - 4 horas Hora Sidérea con Precisión Navegacional - MS Excel Hora Sidérea - ActiveX Sidereal Time to Navigational Accuracy - MS Excel ActiveX Sidereal Timer Esta página (This page) Web Counters Dot TK Observatorio ARVAL para mantenerla activa. Dot TK Observatorio ARVAL Optimizado para ser visto con ( Best seen with Observatorio ARVAL : www.oarval.org desde (since) Sep. 26 '01 www.arval.org.ve Comunicaciones - Communications Home Page Personal Personal Home Page 
